vi: Đồ gỗ > Ghế: Ghế bành, Ghế tựa & Ghế lười; Ghế túi; Ghế thư giãn; Ghế mát-xa điện; Ghế bệt; Ghế xếp; Ghế chơi game; Ghế treo; Ghế trẻ em; Ghế ăn; Ghế bập bênh; Ghế slipper; Bàn ghế quầy bar
ko: 가구 > 의자: 암체어/리클라이너/소파 침대; 빈 백 의자; 등받이 의자; 전기 마사지 의자; 실내용 의자; 접이식 의자/스툴; 게임용 의자; 행잉체어; 아동용 의자; 주방/식탁용 의자; 흔들의자; 소형 의자; 탁자/바 스툴
nl: Meubelen > Stoelen: Armstoelen, relaxstoelen en slaapstoelen; Zitzakken; Leunstoelen; Elektrische massagestoelen; Vloerstoelen; Klapstoelen; Gamestoelen; Ophangstoelen; Kinderstoelen; Keuken- en eetkamerstoelen; Schommelstoelen; Slipper chairs; Barkrukken
cs: Nábytek > Židle: Křesla, polohovací křesla a křesla na spaní; Sedací vaky a pytle; Lenošky; Elektrická masážní křesla; Podlahová křesla; Skládací židle a stolky; Hrací křesla; Závěsná křesla; Dětské židle; Kuchyňské a jídelní židle; Houpací židle; Nízké polštářové židle; Barové židle
nb: Møbler > Stoler: Lenestoler, reclinere og sovestoler; Sakkosekker; Chaiser; Elektroniske massasjestoler; Gulvstoler; Sammenleggbare stoler og krakker; Spillestoler; Hengestoler; Barnestoler; Kjøkken- og spisestoler; Gyngestoler; Stoler uten armlener; Bord- og barkrakker
sv: Möbler > Stolar: Karmstolar, fåtöljer och vilstolar; Sittsäckar; Schäser; Elektriska massagestolar; Stolar utan ben; Fällstolar och -pallar; Spelstolar; Hängstolar; Barnstolar; Köks- och vardagsrumsstolar; Gungstolar; Låga fåtöljer; Barpallar och barstolar
pt-PT: Mobiliário > Cadeiras: Cadeiras de braços, poltronas e espreguiçadeiras; Pufes; Chaise longue; Cadeiras de massagem elétricas; Cadeiras de chão; Cadeiras e bancos dobráveis; Cadeiras de gaming; Cadeiras suspensas; Cadeiras para crianças; Cadeiras de cozinha e de sala de jantar; Cadeiras de baloiço; Poltronas; Bancos de mesa e bar
lt-LT: Baldai > Kėdės: Foteliai, atlošiami foteliai ir miegamieji foteliai; Sėdmaišiai; Ilgi foteliai; Elektrinės masažinės kėdės; Kėdės be kojelių; Sulankstomos kėdės ir taburetės; Žaidimų kėdės; Pakabinamos kėdės; Vaikiškos kėdės; Virtuvės ir valgomojo kėdės; Supamosios kėdės; Žemos minkštos kėdės; Stalo ir baro kėdės
tr: Mobilyalar > Sandalyeler: Koltuklar, Yatar Koltuklar ve Uyku Sandalyeleri; Armut Koltuklar; Uzanma Koltukları; Elektrikli Masaj Koltukları; Yer Sandalyeleri; Katlanır Sandalye ve Tabureler; Oyuncu Koltukları; Asılı Koltuklar; Çocuk sandalyeleri; Mutfak ve Yemek Odası Sandalyeleri; Sallanan Sandalyeler; Tekli Kolsuz Kanepeler; Masa ve Bar Tabureleri
hu: Bútor > Székek: Karosszékek, fotelek és kihúzható székek; Babzsák-székek; Sezlonok; Elektromos masszírozó székek; Padlószékek; Összecsukható székek és puffok; Játékszékek; Függőszékek; Gyerekszékek; Konyhai és étkezőszékek; Ringatószékek; Karfa nélküli kárpitozott székek; Asztali és bárszékek
ru: Мебель > Кресла и стулья: Кресла, реклайнеры и кресла-кровати; Кресла-мешки; Кресла-лежанки; Массажные кресла; Напольные кресла; Складные стулья и табуреты; Игровые кресла; Подвесные кресла; Детские стулья; Стулья для кухни и столовой; Кресла-качалки; Кресла без подлокотников; Барные стулья и табуреты
sl-SI: Pohištvo > Stoli: Naslanjači, stoli z nastavljivim naslonom in fotelji; Vreče za sedenje; Počivalniki; Električni masažni stoli; Talni stoli; Zložljivi stoli in stolčki; Gaming stoli; Viseči stoli; Otroški stoli; Stoli za kuhinjo in jedilnico; Gugalniki; Sedeži brez naslona; Mize in barski stoli
fi: Huonekalut > Tuolit: Nojatuolit, mekanismituolit ja lepotuolit; Säkkituolit; Seslongit; Sähköiset hierontatuolit; Lattiatuolit; Taittuvat tuolit ja jakkarat; Pelituolit; Riipputuolit; Lastentuolit; Keittiö- ja ruokailutuolit; Keinutuolit; Käsinojattomat nojatuolit; Baarituolit ja -jakkarat
hr-HR: Namještaj > Stolice: Fotelje, naslonjači i fotelje na razvlačenje; Vreće za sjedenje; Počivaljke; Električne fotelje za masažu; Podne stolice; Sklopive stolice i stolci; Gaming stolice; Viseće stolice; Dječje stolice; Stolice za kuhinju i blagovaonicu; Stolice za njihanje; Fotelje bez naslona za ruke; Blagovaonski i barski stolci
en: Furniture > Chairs: Armchairs, Recliners & Sleeper Chairs; Bean Bag Chairs; Chaises; Electric Massaging Chairs; Floor Chairs; Folding Chairs & Stools; Gaming Chairs; Hanging Chairs; Kids' Chairs; Kitchen & Dining Room Chairs; Rocking Chairs; Slipper Chairs; Table & Bar Stools
bg-BG: Мебели > Столове: Фотьойли, кресла и столове за спане; Столове тип „барбарони“; Лежанки; Електрически масажни столове; Подови столове; Сгъваеми столове и табуретки; Игрални столове; Висящи столове; Детски столове; Столове за кухня и трапезария; Люлеещи се столове; Ниски кресла; Маси и бар столове
ja: 家具 > 椅子: アームチェア、リクライニングチェア、スリーパーチェア; ビーンバッグ; シェーズロング; 電動マッサージチェア; 座椅子; 折りたたみ椅子; ゲーム用椅子; ハンギングチェア; キッズチェア; ダイニングチェア; ロッキングチェア; ラウンジチェア; テーブル・バースツール
sk-SK: Nábytok > Stoličky: Kreslá, relaxačné kreslá a leňošky; Sedacie vaky; Stoličky; Elektrické masážne kreslá; Podlahové kreslá; Skladacie stoličky a stolíky; Herné stoličky; Závesné kreslá; Detské stoličky; Stoličky do kuchyne a jedálne; Hojdacie kreslá; Nízke čalúnené stoličky; Stolové a barové stoličky
de: Möbel > Stühle: Sessel, Lehnstühle und Schlafsessel; Sitzsäcke; Liegemöbel; Elektrische Massagesessel; Bodenstühle; Klappstühle & Holzhocker; Multimediasessel; Hängesessel; Kinderstühle; Küchen- und Esszimmerstühle; Schaukelstühle; Sessel ohne Armlehnen; Hocker & Barhocker
it: Arredamento > Sedie: Poltrone, sedie con schienale reclinabile e poltrone reclinabili; Poltrone a sacco; Chaise; Poltrone massaggianti; Sedie da pavimento; Sedie e sgabelli pieghevoli; Sedie da gioco; Sedie sospese; Sedie per bambini; Sedie per cucina e sala da pranzo; Sedie a dondolo; Poltrone basse; Sgabelli da bar e da tavolo
el: Έπιπλα > Καρέκλες: Πολυθρόνες, ανακλινόμενες πολυθρόνες & πολυθρόνες-κρεβάτια; Καρέκλες Bean Bag; Σεζ; Ηλεκτρικές καρέκλες για μασάζ; Καρέκλες δαπέδου; Πτυσσόμενες καρέκλες & σκαμπό; Καρέκλες Gaming; Αιώρες-πολυθρόνες; Παιδικές καρέκλες; Καρέκλες κουζίνας & τραπεζαρίας; Κουνιστές καρέκλες; Καρέκλες σαλονιού; Σκαμπό τραπεζιού & μπαρ
pt-BR: Móveis > Cadeiras: Poltronas, cadeiras reclináveis e poltronas-cama; Pufes redondos; Cadeira espreguiçadeira; Cadeiras de massagem elétricas; Cadeiras de chão; Cadeiras e bancos dobráveis; Cadeiras de jogo; Cadeiras suspensas; Cadeiras infantis; Cadeiras de cozinha e sala de jantar; Cadeiras de balanço; Poltronas; Bancos altos para bares
da: Møbler > Stole: Lænestole, liggestole og sovestole; Sækkestole; Chaisselonger; Elektriske massagestole; Gulvstole; Klapstole og foldetaburetter; Spillestole; Hængestole; Børnestole; Køkken- og spisestuestole; Gyngestole; Polstrede stole; Barstole
pl: Meble > Krzesła i fotele: Fotele, leżanki i fotele rozkładane; Worki do siedzenia; Szezlongi; Fotele masujące; Krzesła bez nóg; Składane krzesła i stołki; Fotele do grania; Krzesła wiszące; Krzesełka dziecięce; Krzesła do kuchni i jadalni; Fotele bujane; Fotele bez podłokietników; Stoły i hokery barowe
th: เฟอร์นิเจอร์ > เก้าอี้: เก้าอี้ที่มีที่วางแขน เก้าอี้มีพนักพิงเอนไปด้านหลังได้ และเก้าอี้ที่นอนได้; เก้าอี้เม็ดโฟม; เก้าอี้นวมยาว; เก้าอี้นวดไฟฟ้า; เก้าอี้ตั้งพื้น; เก้าอี้และม้านั่งแบบพับได้; เก้าอี้สำหรับเล่นเกม; เก้าอี้แขวน; เก้าอี้เด็ก; เก้าอี้สำหรับห้องครัวและห้องรับประทานอาหาร; เก้าอี้โยก; เก้าอี้ไม่มีที่ท้าวแขน; ม้านั่งสำหรับโต๊ะและบาร์
zh-CN: 家具 > 椅子: 扶手椅/伸缩躺椅/睡椅; 豆袋椅/懒人沙发; 休闲椅; 电动按摩椅; 无腿懒人椅; 折叠椅/折叠凳; 游戏椅; 吊椅; 儿童椅; 厨房/餐厅坐椅; 摇椅; 有靠背矮脚椅; 桌凳/高脚凳
ro-RO: Mobilier > Scaune: Fotolii, scaune cu spătar rabatabil și scaune pentru dormit; Scaune tip Bean Bag; Scaune tip șezlong; Scaune electrice de masaj; Scaune de podea; Taburete și scaune pliante; Scaune pentru jocuri; Scaune suspendate; Scaune pentru copii; Scaune pentru bucătărie și sufragerie; Balansoare; Fotolii joase; Scaune pentru masă și scaune de bar
es: Mobiliario > Sillas: Sillones, sillones reclinables y sillones cama; Pufs; Divanes; Sillones de masaje eléctricos; Sillas de suelo; Taburetes y sillas plegables; Sillones para videojuegos; Sillas colgantes; Sillas infantiles; Sillas para salón comedor y cocina; Mecedoras; Sillas poltrona; Taburetes de mesa y bar
zh-TW: 家具 > 椅子: 扶手椅、沙發椅和沙發床; 懶骨頭/豆袋椅; 靠椅; 電動按摩椅; 和室椅; 折疊椅/凳; 電競椅; 吊椅; 兒童椅; 廚房/飯廳椅; 搖椅; 休閒椅; 升降高腳凳
fr: Meubles > Chaises: Fauteuils, fauteuils inclinables et fauteuils-lits; Poufs poires; Chaises longues; Fauteuils de massage électriques; Fauteuils de sol; Chaises pliantes et tabourets pliants; Fauteuils de jeux; Fauteuils suspendus; Chaises pour enfants; Chaises de cuisine et de salle à manger; Fauteuils à bascule; Chauffeuses; Tabourets et chaises de bar